Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§§ 1-12.
Repealed.
1975, No. 89, § 15.

§ 13.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Attest services” means providing the following services:
(1) (A) “Attest services” means providing the following services:

any audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Auditing Standards (SAS);

any review of a financial statement or compilation of a financial statement to be performed in accordance with the Statement on Standards for Accounting and Review Services (SSARS);

any examination of prospective financial information to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Attestation Engagements (SSAE);

any engagement to be performed in accordance with the auditing standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (PCAOB); or

any examination, review, or agreed upon procedures engagement to be performed in accordance with the SSAE, other than an examination described in subdivision (iii) of this subdivision (1)(A).

The statements on standards specified in this section shall be adopted by reference by the Board pursuant to rulemaking, and shall be those developed for general application by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

“Board” means the Board of Public Accountancy.

“Compilation” means providing a service to be performed in accordance with Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services (SSARS) that is presented in the form of financial statements or information that represents management or owners without expressing any type of assurance on the statements.

[Repealed.]

“Firm” means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, a partnership, association, or any other entity that practices public accountancy.

[Repealed.]

“Good character” means fiscal integrity, and a lack of any history of acts involving dishonesty, false statements, or fraud.

“Home office” means the location specified by the client as the address to which a service described in subsection 74c(c) of this title is directed.

“Peer review” means a systemwide study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a person or firm in the practice of public accounting that performs attest services by a person or persons who are licensed under this chapter and who are not affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed.

“Practice of public accounting” means the performance or the offering to perform by a person or firm holding itself out to the public as being licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized under this chapter, for a client or potential client, of one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including the issuance of reports on financial statements, or of one or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, or consulting services, or the preparation of tax returns or the furnishing of advice on tax matters.

“Principal place of business” means the office location designated by the licensee for the purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity.

“Public accountant” means a certified public accountant or a registered public accountant until July 1, 2003, after which the title of registered public accountant will still exist for those licensed as registered public accountants or having received conditional credit toward licensure as a registered public accountant by that date, but will no longer be a title granted by the Board.

“Report” when used with reference to any attest or compilation service, means an opinion, report, or other form of language that states or implies assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements and that also includes or is accompanied by any statement or implication that the person or firm issuing it has special knowledge or competence in accounting or auditing.

A statement or implication of special knowledge or competence may arise from use by the issuer of the report of names or titles indicating that the person or firm is an accountant or auditor, or from the language of the report itself.

The term “report” includes any form of language that disclaims an opinion when the form of language is conventionally understood to imply any positive assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements referred to or special competence on the part of the person or firm issuing the language; and it includes any other form of language that is conventionally understood to imply such assurance or such special knowledge or competence.

“Sole proprietorship,” when used for the specific purpose of describing the fee category applicable to a firm under this chapter, means a firm that employs only one certified public accountant.

“State” includes the states of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, the U.S. Virgin Islands, and other jurisdictions recognized by the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy (NASBA).

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 89

, § 7; amended

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 4;

2009, No. 35

, § 4;

2017, No. 48

, § 8;

2019, No. 30

, § 9.

§ 14.
Prohibitions.

No person or firm shall issue a report on financial statements of, or provide attest services for, any other person, firm, organization, or governmental unit unless the person or firm is licensed or registered under this chapter. This prohibition does not apply to:

an individual with practice privileges set forth under section 74c of this title or a firm exempt from registration under section 74 of this title;

an officer, partner, or employee of any firm or organization affixing their signature to any statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of that firm or organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office that they hold therein;

any act of a public official or employee in the performance of his or her duties as such;

the performance by any persons of other services involving the use of accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns, management advisory services, and the preparation of financial statements without the issuance of reports thereon.

No individual person may use the title “certified public accountant,” “CPA,” “registered public accountant,” “RPA,” or “auditor” or any other title tending to indicate that he or she is a public accountant, unless he or she is licensed as a public accountant under this chapter or is an individual with practice privileges set forth under section 74c of this title.

No firm may use the title “certified public accountant,” “CPA,” “registered public accountant,” “RPA,” “auditor” or any other title tending to indicate that it is composed of public accountants unless the firm is registered under this chapter, or is exempt from registration under section 74 of this title.

No person may use the title “chartered accountant,” “enrolled accountant,” “licensed accountant,” “certified accountant,” “registered accountant,” “accredited accountant,” or any other title likely to be confused with “certified public accountant” or “registered public accountant,” or the abbreviations “CA,” “EA,” “RA,” “LA,” or “AA,” or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with “CPA” or “RPA.” However, a person licensed under this chapter and individuals with practice privileges set forth under section 74c of this title may use the title “auditor.” The title “enrolled agent” or “EA” may be used only by an individual so designated by the Internal Revenue Service.

No person or firm holding a license under this chapter shall use a professional or firm name or designation that is misleading about the legal form of the firm, or about the persons who are partners, officers, members, managers or shareholders of the firm, or about any other matter; provided, however, that the names of one or more partners, members, managers, or shareholders may be included in the name of a firm or its successor.

However, a sole proprietorship or partnership lawfully using a title or designation in conjunction with those names or designation on July 1, 1981, may continue to do so if that person or partnership otherwise complies with the provisions of this chapter.

The prohibition contained in subsection (a) of this section is applicable to issuance, by a person or firm not holding a valid license or registration, of a report using any form of language conventionally used by public accountants with respect to an audit, review, compilation of financial statements, or other attest services.

No person or firm shall hold themselves out as public accountants while engaged in the practice of public accounting unless they:

hold a valid license or registration issued under this chapter;

qualify for practice privileges set forth under section 74c of this title; or

are exempt from registration under section 74 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 89

, § 8; amended

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.) § 2;

1997, No. 40

, § 9;

1999, No. 52

, § 4;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 5;

2009, No. 35

, § 5.

§ 15.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit:

A federal, State, or municipal officer or employee from performing the lawful functions and duties of any office or service required.

An officer, employee, partner, or principal of any organization from:

signing a statement or report in reference to the affairs of that organization, with wording designating the title held in the organization; or

describing himself or herself by title.

A person from offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping and tax services, including devising and installing systems, recording and presenting financial information or data, preparing financial statements, schedules, reports, and exhibits, and similar services.

An individual person from using a title previously held as a public accountant licensed or certified in this or any other state, provided that the person’s license or certificate was not revoked or suspended, and provided further that the person is not currently engaged in the practice of public accounting and does not use the title for the purpose of practicing public accounting.

Other licensed or certified professionals from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions of their professions.

A firm, which does not hold a valid registration under section 74 of this title and which does not have an office in this State, from providing its professional services and from practicing public accounting in this State as long as the firm complies with the requirements of subsection 74(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 89

, § 9; amended

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 6;

2009, No. 35

, § 6.

§ 16.
Repealed. 1981, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 17.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of section 14 of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 89

, § 11; amended

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 29

, § 7;

2019, No. 30

, § 9.

§ 18.
Repealed. 1981, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.